bn_BD/bn_IN.aff
PFX	y	Y	128
PFX	y   	আ	এ/X		আ
PFX	y   	ও	উ/X		ও
PFX	y	0	0/X	ক[^ােো]
PFX	y	ক	কো/X	ক[^ােো]$
PFX	y	কা	কে/X	কা
PFX	y	কে	কি/X	কে
PFX	y	কো	কু/X	কো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ক্ষ[^ােো]
PFX	y	ক্ষা	ক্ষে/X	ক্ষা
PFX	y	ক্ষে	ক্ষি/X	ক্ষে
PFX	y	ক্ষো	ক্ষু/X	ক্ষো
PFX	y	0	0/X	খ[^াো]
PFX	y	খা	খে/X	খা
PFX	y	খে	খি/X	খে
PFX	y	খো	খু/X	খো
PFX	y	0	0/X	গ[^ােো]
PFX	y	গা	গে/X	গা
PFX	y	গে	গি/X	গে
PFX	y	গো	গু/X	গো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ঘ[^ােো]
PFX	y	ঘা	ঘে/X	ঘা
PFX	y	ঘে	ঘি/X	ঘে
PFX	y	ঘো	ঘু/X	ঘো
PFX	y	0	0/X	চ[^ােো]
PFX	y	চা	চে/X	চা
PFX	y	চে	চি/X	চে
PFX	y	চো	চু/X	চো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ছ[^ােো]
PFX	y	ছা	ছে/X	ছা
PFX	y	ছে	ছি/X	ছে
PFX	y	ছো	ছু/X	ছো
PFX	y	0	0/X	জ[^ােো]
PFX	y	জা	জে/X	জা
PFX	y	জে	জি/X	জে
PFX	y	জো	জু/X	জো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ঝ[^ােো]
PFX	y	ঝা	ঝে/X	ঝা
PFX	y	ঝে	ঝি/X	ঝে
PFX	y	ঝো	ঝু/X	ঝো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ট[^ােো]
PFX	y	টা	টে/X	টা
PFX	y	টে	টি/X	টে
PFX	y	টো	টু/X	টো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ঠ[^ােো]
PFX	y	ঠা	ঠে/X	ঠা
PFX	y	ঠে	ঠি/X	ঠে
PFX	y	ঠো	ঠু/X	ঠো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ড[^ােো]
PFX	y	ডা	ডে/X	ডা
PFX	y	ডে	ডি/X	ডে
PFX	y	ডো	ডু/X	ডো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ড়[^ােো]
PFX	y	ড়া	ড়ে/X	ড়া
PFX	y	ড়ে	ড়ি/X	ড়ে
PFX	y	ড়ো	ড়ু/X	ড়ো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ঢ[^ােো]
PFX	y	ঢা	ঢে/X	ঢা
PFX	y	ঢে	ঢি/X	ঢে
PFX	y	ঢো	ঢু/X	ঢো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ত[^ােো]
PFX	y	তা	তে/X	তা
PFX	y	তে	তি/X	তে
PFX	y	তো	তু/X	তো
PFX	y	0	0/X	থ[^ােো]
PFX	y	থ	থো/X	থ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	y	থা	থে/X	থা
PFX	y	থে	থি/X	থে
PFX	y	থো	থু/X	থো
PFX	y	0	0/X	দ[^ােো]
PFX	y	দা	দে/X	দা
PFX	y	দে	দি/X	দে
PFX	y	দো	দু/X	দো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ধ[^ােো]
PFX	y	ধা	ধে/X	ধা
PFX	y	ধে	ধি/X	ধে
PFX	y	ধো	ধু/X	ধো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ন[^ােো]
PFX	y	না	নে/X	না
PFX	y	নে	নি/X	নে
PFX	y	নো	নু/X	নো
PFX	y	0	0/X	প[^ােো]
PFX	y	পা	পে/X	পা
PFX	y	পে	পি/X	পে
PFX	y	পো	পু/X	পো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ফ[^ােো]
PFX	y	ফা	ফে/X	ফা
PFX	y	ফে	ফি/X	ফে
PFX	y	ফো	ফু/X	ফো
PFX	y	ব	ব/X	ব[^ােো]
PFX	y	বা	বে/X	বা
PFX	y	বে	বি/X	বে
PFX	y	বো	বু/X	বো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ভ[^ােো]
PFX	y	ভা	ভে/X	ভা
PFX	y	ভে	ভি/X	ভে
PFX	y	ভো	ভু/X	ভো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ম[^ােো]
PFX	y	মা	মে/X	মা
PFX	y	মে	মি/X	মে
PFX	y	মো	মু/X	মো
PFX	y	0	0/X	য[^ােো]
PFX	y	যা	গি/X	যা				irregularity
PFX	y	যে	যি/X	যে
PFX	y	যো	যু/X	যো
PFX	y	0	0/X	র[^ােো]
PFX	y	রা	রে/X	রা
PFX	y	রে	রি/X	রে
PFX	y	রো	রু/X	রো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ল[^ােো]
PFX	y	লা	লে/X	লা
PFX	y	লে	লি/X	লে
PFX	y	লো	লু/X	লো
PFX	y	0	0/X	শ[^ােো]
PFX	y	শা	শে/X	শা
PFX	y	শে	শি/X	শে
PFX	y	শো	শু/X	শো
PFX	y	0	0/X	ষ[^ােো]
PFX	y	ষা	ষে/X	ষা
PFX	y	ষে	ষি/X	ষে
PFX	y	ষো	ষু/X	ষো
PFX	y	0	0/X	স[^ােো]
PFX	y	সা	সে/X	সা
PFX	y	সে	সি/X	সে
PFX	y	সো	সু/X	সো
PFX	y	0	0/X	হ[^ােো]
PFX	y	হা	হে/X	হা
PFX	y	হে	হি/X	হে
PFX	y	হো	হু/X	হো

# Future Imperative of তুমি form (চলিত)  has a unusually strong propensity to change the initial vowel:
# e.g.  কড়কা > কোড়কো
PFX	z	Y	157
PFX	z   আ	এ/X		আ
PFX	z   ও	উ/X		ও
PFX	z	0	0/X	ক[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ক	কো/X	ক[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	কা	কে/X	কা
PFX	z	কে	কি/X	কে
PFX	z	কো	কু/X	কো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ক্ষ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ক্ষ	ক্ষো/X	ক্ষ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	ক্ষা	ক্ষে/X	ক্ষা
PFX	z	ক্ষে	ক্ষি/X	ক্ষে
PFX	z	ক্ষো	ক্ষু/X	ক্ষো
PFX	z	0	0/X	খ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	খ	খো/X	খ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	খা	খে/X	খা
PFX	z	খে	খি/X	খে
PFX	z	খো	খু/X	খো
PFX	z	0	0/X	গ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	গ	গো/X	গ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	গা	গে/X	গা
PFX	z	গে	গি/X	গে
PFX	z	গো	গু/X	গো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ঘ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ঘ	ঘো/X	ঘ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	ঘা	ঘে/X	ঘা
PFX	z	ঘে	ঘি/X	ঘে
PFX	z	ঘো	ঘু/X	ঘো
PFX	z	0	0/X	চ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	চ	চো/X	চ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	চা	চে/X	চা
PFX	z	চে	চি/X	চে
PFX	z	চো	চু/X	চো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ছ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ছ	ছো/X	ছ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	ছা	ছে/X	ছা
PFX	z	ছে	ছি/X	ছে
PFX	z	ছো	ছু/X	ছো
PFX	z	0	0/X	জ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	জ	জো/X	জ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	জা	জে/X	জা
PFX	z	জে	জি/X	জে
PFX	z	জো	জু/X	জো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ঝ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ঝ	ঝো/X	ঝ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	ঝা	ঝে/X	ঝা
PFX	z	ঝে	ঝি/X	ঝে
PFX	z	ঝো	ঝু/X	ঝো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ট[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ট	টো/X	ট[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	টা	টে/X	টা
PFX	z	টে	টি/X	টে
PFX	z	টো	টু/X	টো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ঠ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ঠ	ঠো/X	ঠ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	ঠা	ঠে/X	ঠা
PFX	z	ঠে	ঠি/X	ঠে
PFX	z	ঠো	ঠু/X	ঠো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ড[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ড	ডো/X	ড[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	ডা	ডে/X	ডা
PFX	z	ডে	ডি/X	ডে
PFX	z	ডো	ডু/X	ডো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ড়[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ড়	ড়ো/X	ড়[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	ড়া	ড়ে/X	ড়া
PFX	z	ড়ে	ড়ি/X	ড়ে
PFX	z	ড়ো	ড়ু/X	ড়ো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ঢ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ঢ	ঢো/X	ঢ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	ঢা	ঢে/X	ঢা
PFX	z	ঢে	ঢি/X	ঢে
PFX	z	ঢো	ঢু/X	ঢো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ত[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ত	তো/X	ত[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	তা	তে/X	তা
PFX	z	তে	তি/X	তে
PFX	z	তো	তু/X	তো
PFX	z	0	0/X	থ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	থ	থো/X	থ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	থা	থে/X	থা
PFX	z	থে	থি/X	থে
PFX	z	থো	থু/X	থো
PFX	z	0	0/X	দ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	দ	দো/X	দ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	দা	দে/X	দা
PFX	z	দে	দি/X	দে
PFX	z	দো	দু/X	দো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ধ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ধ	ধো/X	ধ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	ধা	ধে/X	ধা
PFX	z	ধে	ধি/X	ধে
PFX	z	ধো	ধু/X	ধো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ন[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ন	নো/X	ন[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	না	নে/X	না
PFX	z	নে	নি/X	নে
PFX	z	নো	নু/X	নো
PFX	z	0	0/X	প[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	প	পো/X	প[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	পা	পে/X	পা
PFX	z	পে	পি/X	পে
PFX	z	পো	পু/X	পো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ফ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ফ	ফো/X	ফ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	ফা	ফে/X	ফা
PFX	z	ফে	ফি/X	ফে
PFX	z	ফো	ফু/X	ফো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ব[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ব	বো/X	ব[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	বা	বে/X	বা
PFX	z	বে	বি/X	বে
PFX	z	বো	বু/X	বো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ভ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ভ	ভো/X	ভ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	ভা	ভে/X	ভা
PFX	z	ভে	ভি/X	ভে
PFX	z	ভো	ভু/X	ভো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ম[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ম	মো/X	ম[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	মা	মে/X	মা
PFX	z	মে	মি/X	মে
PFX	z	মো	মু/X	মো
PFX	z	0	0/X	য[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	য	যো/X	য[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	যা	গি/X	যা				irregularity
PFX	z	যে	যি/X	যে
PFX	z	যো	যু/X	যো
PFX	z	0	0/X	র[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	র	রো/X	র[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	রা	রে/X	রা
PFX	z	রে	রি/X	রে
PFX	z	রো	রু/X	রো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ল[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ল	লো/X	ল[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	লা	লে/X	লা
PFX	z	লে	লি/X	লে
PFX	z	লো	লু/X	লো
PFX	z	0	0/X	শ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	শ	শো/X	শ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	শা	শে/X	শা
PFX	z	শে	শি/X	শে
PFX	z	শো	শু/X	শো
PFX	z	0	0/X	ষ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	ষ	ষো/X	ষ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	ষা	ষে/X	ষা
PFX	z	ষে	ষি/X	ষে
PFX	z	ষো	ষু/X	ষো
PFX	z	0	0/X	স[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	স	সো/X	স[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	সা	সে/X	সা
PFX	z	সে	সি/X	সে
PFX	z	সো	সু/X	সো
PFX	z	0	0/X	হ[িীুূৃৈৌ]
PFX	z	হ	হো/X	হ[^িীুূৃেৈোৌ]
PFX	z	হা	হে/X	হা
PFX	z	হে	হি/X	হে
PFX	z	হো	হু/X	হো


# Opposite of x used for ানো verbs in continuous class
PFX	Z	Y 	102
PFX	Z	0	0/X	[অআএও]
PFX	Z	 উ	ও/X	উ
PFX	Z	 ই	এ/X	ই
PFX	Z	 ক	ক/X	 ক[^ুি]
PFX	Z	কি	কে/X	কি$
PFX	Z	কু	কো/X	কু$
PFX	Z	 ক্ষ	ক্ষ/X	 ক্ষ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	ক্ষি	ক্ষে/X	ক্ষি$
PFX	Z	ক্ষু	ক্ষো/X	ক্ষু$
PFX	Z	 গ	গ/X	 গ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	গি	গে/X	গি$
PFX	Z	গু	গো/X	গু$
PFX	Z	 খ	খ/X	 খ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	খি	খে/X	খি$
PFX	Z	খু	খো/X	খু$
PFX	Z	 ঘ	ঘ/X	 [^ুি]ঘ
PFX	Z	ঘি	ঘে/X	ঘি$
PFX	Z	ঘু	ঘু/X	ঘু		irregularity for ঘুমানো$
PFX	Z	চ	চ/X	চ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	চি	চে/X	চি$
PFX	Z	চু	চো/X	চু$
PFX	Z	 ছ	ছ/X	 ছ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	ছি	ছে/X	ছি$
PFX	Z	ছু	ছো/X	ছু$
PFX	Z	 জ	জ/X	 জ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	জি	জে/X	জি$
PFX	Z	জু	জো/X	জু$
PFX	Z	 ঝ	ঝ/X	 ঝ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	ঝি	ঝে/X	ঝি$
PFX	Z	ঝু	ঝো/X	ঝু$
PFX	Z	 ঞ	ঞ/X	 ঞ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	ঞি	ঞে/X	ঞি$
PFX	Z	ঞু	ঞো/X	ঞু$
PFX	Z	 ট	ট/X	 ট[^ুি]
PFX	Z	টি	টে/X	টি$
PFX	Z	টু	টো/X	টু$
PFX	Z	 ঠ	ঠ/X	 ঠ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	ঠি	ঠে/X	ঠি$
PFX	Z	ঠু	ঠো/X	ঠু$
PFX	Z	 ড	ড/X	 ড[^ুি]
PFX	Z	ডি	ডে/X	ডি$
PFX	Z	ডু	ডো/X	ডু$
PFX	Z	 ড়	ড়/X	 ড়[^ুি]
PFX	Z	ড়ি	ড়ে/X	ড়ি$
PFX	Z	ড়ু	ড়ো/X	ড়ু$
PFX	Z	 ঢ	ঢ/X	 ঢ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	ঢি	ঢে/X	ঢি$
PFX	Z	ঢু	ঢো/X	ঢু$
PFX	Z	 ণ	ণ/X	 ণ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	ণি	ণে/X	ণি$
PFX	Z	ণু	ণো/X	ণু$
PFX	Z	 ত	ত/X	 ত[^ুি]
PFX	Z	তি	তে/X	তি$
PFX	Z	তু	তো/X	তু$
PFX	Z	 থ	থ/X	 থ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	থি	থে/X	থি$
PFX	Z	থু	থো/X	থু$
PFX	Z	 দ	দ/X	 দ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	দি	দে/X	দি$
PFX	Z	দু	দো/X	দু$
PFX	Z	 ধ	ধ/X	 ধ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	ধি	ধে/X	ধি$
PFX	Z	ধু	ধো/X	ধু$
PFX	Z	 ন	ন/X	 ন[^ুি]
PFX	Z	নি	নে/X	নি$
PFX	Z	নু	নো/X	নু$
PFX	Z	 প	প/X	 প[^ুি]
PFX	Z	পি	পে/X	পি$
PFX	Z	পু	পো/X	পু$
PFX	Z	 ফ	ফ/X	 ফ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	ফি	ফে/X	ফি$
PFX	Z	ফু	ফো/X	ফু$
PFX	Z	 ব	ব/X	 ব[^ুি]
PFX	Z	বি	বে/X	বি$
PFX	Z	বু	বো/X	বু$
PFX	Z	 ভ	ভ/X	 ভ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	ভি	ভে/X	ভি$
PFX	Z	ভু	ভো/X	ভু$
PFX	Z	 ম	ম/X	 ম[^ুি]
PFX	Z	মি	মে/X	মি$
PFX	Z	মু	মো/X	মু$
PFX	Z	 য	য/X	 য[^ুি]
PFX	Z	যি	যে/X	যি$
PFX	Z	যু	যো/X	যু$
PFX	Z	 র	র/X	 র[^ুি]
PFX	Z	রি	রে/X	রি$
PFX	Z	রু	রো/X	রু$
PFX	Z	 ল	ল/X	 ল[^ুি]
PFX	Z	লি	লে/X	লি$
PFX	Z	লু	লো/X	লু$
PFX	Z	 শ	শ/X	 শ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	শি	শে/X	শি$
PFX	Z	শু	শো/X	শু$
PFX	Z	 ষ	ষ/X	 ষ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	ষি	ষে/X	ষি$
PFX	Z	ষু	ষো/X	ষু$
PFX	Z	 স	স/X	 স[^ুি]
PFX	Z	সি	সে/X	সি$
PFX	Z	সু	সো/X	সু$
PFX	Z	 হ	হ/X	 হ[^ুি]
PFX	Z	হি	হে/X	হি$
PFX	Z	হু	হো/X	হু$


# simple া verb prefixes for shadhu form - generally stays the same
# Rules: ে>ি, ো>ু  only changes
# changed 3/4/2017

PFX	x	Y 	100
PFX	x	0	0/X		[অআউএও]
PFX	x	ক	 ক/X	ক[^েো]
PFX	x	কি	কে/X	কি			irregularity for কিনা genetive of verbal noun 'কেনবার'
PFX	x	কো	কু/X	কো
PFX	x	ক্ষ	 ক্ষ/X	ক্ষ[^েো]
PFX	x	ক্ষে	ক্ষি/X	ক্ষে
PFX	x	ক্ষো	ক্ষু/X	ক্ষো
PFX	x	গ	 গ/X	গ[^েো]
PFX	x	গে	গি/X	গে
PFX	x	গো	গু/X	গো
PFX	x	খ	 খ/X	খ[^েো]
PFX	x	খে	খি/X	খে
PFX	x	খো	খু/X	খো
PFX	x	ঘ	 ঘ/X	ঘ[^েো]
PFX	x	ঘে	ঘি/X	ঘে
PFX	x	ঘো	ঘু/X	ঘো
PFX	x	চ	চ/X	চ[^েো]
PFX	x	চে	চি/X	চে
PFX	x	চো	চু/X	চো
PFX	x	ছ	 ছ/X	ছ[^েো]
PFX	x	ছে	ছি/X	ছে
PFX	x	ছো	ছু/X	ছো
PFX	x	জ	 জ/X	জ[^েো]
PFX	x	জে	জি/X	জে
PFX	x	জো	জু/X	জো
PFX	x	ঝ	 ঝ/X	ঝ[^েো]
PFX	x	ঝে	ঝি/X	ঝে
PFX	x	ঝো	ঝু/X	ঝো
PFX	x	ঞ	 ঞ/X	ঞ[^েো]
PFX	x	ঞে	ঞি/X	ঞে
PFX	x	ঞো	ঞু/X	ঞো
PFX	x	ট	 ট/X	ট[^েো]
PFX	x	টে	টি/X	টে
PFX	x	টো	টু/X	টো
PFX	x	ঠ	 ঠ/X	ঠ[^েো]
PFX	x	ঠে	ঠি/X	ঠে
PFX	x	ঠো	ঠু/X	ঠো
PFX	x	ড	 ড/X	ড[^েো]
PFX	x	ডে	ডি/X	ডে
PFX	x	ডো	ডু/X	ডো
PFX	x	ড়	 ড়/X	ড়[^েো]
PFX	x	ড়ে	ড়ি/X	ড়ে
PFX	x	ড়ো	ড়ু/X	ড়ো
PFX	x	ঢ	 ঢ/X	ঢ[^েো]
PFX	x	ঢে	ঢি/X	ঢে
PFX	x	ঢো	ঢু/X	ঢো
PFX	x	ণ	 ণ/X	ণ[^েো]
PFX	x	ণে	ণি/X	ণে
PFX	x	ণো	ণু/X	ণো
PFX	x	ত	 ত/X	ত[^েো]
PFX	x	তে	তি/X	তে
PFX	x	তো	তু/X	তো
PFX	x	থ	 থ/X	থ[^েো]
PFX	x	থে	থি/X	থে
PFX	x	থো	থু/X	থো
PFX	x	দ	 দ/X	দ[^েো]
PFX	x	দে	দি/X	দে
PFX	x	দো	দু/X	দো
PFX	x	ধ	 ধ/X	ধ[^েো]
PFX	x	ধে	ধি/X	ধে
PFX	x	ধো	ধু/X	ধো
PFX	x	ন	 ন/X	ন[^েো]
PFX	x	নে	নি/X	নে
PFX	x	নো	নু/X	নো
PFX	x	প	 প/X	প[^েো]
PFX	x	পে	পি/X	পে
PFX	x	পো	পু/X	পো
PFX	x	ফ	 ফ/X	ফ[^েো]
PFX	x	ফে	ফি/X	ফে
PFX	x	ফো	ফু/X	ফো
PFX	x	ব	 ব/X	ব[^েো]
PFX	x	বে	বি/X	বে
PFX	x	বো	বু/X	বো
PFX	x	ভ	 ভ/X	ভ[^েো]
PFX	x	ভে	ভি/X	ভে
PFX	x	ভো	ভু/X	ভো
PFX	x	ম	 ম/X	ম[^েো]
PFX	x	মে	মি/X	মে
PFX	x	মো	মু/X	মো
PFX	x	য	 য/X	য[^েো]
PFX	x	যে	যি/X	যে
PFX	x	যো	যু/X	যো
PFX	x	র	 র/X	র[^েো]
PFX	x	রে	রি/X	রে
PFX	x	রো	রু/X	রো
PFX	x	ল	 ল/X	ল[^েো]
PFX	x	লে	লি/X	লে
PFX	x	লো	লু/X	লো
PFX	x	শ	 শ/X	শ[^েো]
PFX	x	শে	শি/X	শে
PFX	x	শো	শু/X	শো
PFX	x	ষ	 ষ/X	ষ[^েো]
PFX	x	ষে	ষি/X	ষে
PFX	x	ষো	ষু/X	ষো
PFX	x	স	 স/X	স[^েো]
PFX	x	সে	সি/X	সে
PFX	x	সো	সু/X	সো
PFX	x	হ	 হ/X	হ[^েো]
PFX	x	হে	হি/X	হে
PFX	x	হো	হু/X	হো


# Identical to x, just modified for present & past perfect (shadhu) of দেখানো


PFX	O	Y 	100
PFX	O	0	0/X		[অআউএও]
PFX	O	ক	 ক/X	ক[^েো]
PFX	O	কে	কি/X	কে
PFX	O	কো	কু/X	কো
PFX	O	ক্ষ	 ক্ষ/X	ক্ষ[^েো]
PFX	O	ক্ষে	ক্ষি/X	ক্ষে
PFX	O	ক্ষো	ক্ষু/X	ক্ষো
PFX	O	গ	 গ/X	গ[^েো]
PFX	O	গে	গি/X	গে
PFX	O	গো	গু/X	গো
PFX	O	খ	 খ/X	খ[^েো]
PFX	O	খে	খি/X	খে
PFX	O	খো	খু/X	খো
PFX	O	ঘ	 ঘ/X	ঘ[^েো]
PFX	O	ঘে	ঘি/X	ঘে
PFX	O	ঘো	ঘু/X	ঘো
PFX	O	চ	চ/X	চ[^েো]
PFX	O	চে	চি/X	চে
PFX	O	চো	চু/X	চো
PFX	O	ছ	 ছ/X	ছ[^েো]
PFX	O	ছে	ছি/X	ছে
PFX	O	ছো	ছু/X	ছো
PFX	O	জ	 জ/X	জ[^েো]
PFX	O	জে	জি/X	জে
PFX	O	জো	জু/X	জো
PFX	O	ঝ	 ঝ/X	ঝ[^েো]
PFX	O	ঝে	ঝি/X	ঝে
PFX	O	ঝো	ঝু/X	ঝো
PFX	O	ঞ	 ঞ/X	ঞ[^েো]
PFX	O	ঞে	ঞি/X	ঞে
PFX	O	ঞো	ঞু/X	ঞো
PFX	O	ট	 ট/X	ট[^েো]
PFX	O	টে	টি/X	টে
PFX	O	টো	টু/X	টো
PFX	O	ঠ	 ঠ/X	ঠ[^েো]
PFX	O	ঠে	ঠি/X	ঠে
PFX	O	ঠো	ঠু/X	ঠো
PFX	O	ড	 ড/X	ড[^েো]
PFX	O	ডে	ডি/X	ডে
PFX	O	ডো	ডু/X	ডো
PFX	O	ড়	 ড়/X	ড়[^েো]
PFX	O	ড়ে	ড়ি/X	ড়ে
PFX	O	ড়ো	ড়ু/X	ড়ো
PFX	O	ঢ	 ঢ/X	ঢ[^েো]
PFX	O	ঢে	ঢি/X	ঢে
PFX	O	ঢো	ঢু/X	ঢো
PFX	O	ণ	 ণ/X	ণ[^েো]
PFX	O	ণে	ণি/X	ণে
PFX	O	ণো	ণু/X	ণো
PFX	O	ত	 ত/X	ত[^েো]
PFX	O	তে	তি/X	তে
PFX	O	তো	তু/X	তো
PFX	O	থ	 থ/X	থ[^েো]
PFX	O	থে	থি/X	থে
PFX	O	থো	থু/X	থো
PFX	O	দ	 দ/X	দ[^েো]
PFX	O	দে	দে/X	দে
PFX	O	দো	দু/X	দো
PFX	O	ধ	 ধ/X	ধ[^েো]
PFX	O	ধে	ধি/X	ধে
PFX	O	ধো	ধু/X	ধো
PFX	O	ন	 ন/X	ন[^েো]
PFX	O	নে	নি/X	নে
PFX	O	নো	নু/X	নো
PFX	O	প	 প/X	প[^েো]
PFX	O	পে	পি/X	পে
PFX	O	পো	পু/X	পো
PFX	O	ফ	 ফ/X	ফ[^েো]
PFX	O	ফে	ফি/X	ফে
PFX	O	ফো	ফু/X	ফো
PFX	O	ব	 ব/X	ব[^েো]
PFX	O	বে	বি/X	বে
PFX	O	বো	বু/X	বো
PFX	O	ভ	 ভ/X	ভ[^েো]
PFX	O	ভে	ভি/X	ভে
PFX	O	ভো	ভু/X	ভো
PFX	O	ম	 ম/X	ম[^েো]
PFX	O	মে	মি/X	মে
PFX	O	মো	মু/X	মো
PFX	O	য	 য/X	য[^েো]
PFX	O	যে	যি/X	যে
PFX	O	যো	যু/X	যো
PFX	O	র	 র/X	র[^েো]
PFX	O	রে	রি/X	রে
PFX	O	রো	রু/X	রো
PFX	O	ল	 ল/X	ল[^েো]
PFX	O	লে	লি/X	লে
PFX	O	লো	লু/X	লো
PFX	O	শ	 শ/X	শ[^েো]
PFX	O	শে	শি/X	শে
PFX	O	শো	শু/X	শো
PFX	O	ষ	 ষ/X	ষ[^েো]
PFX	O	ষে	ষি/X	ষে
PFX	O	ষো	ষু/X	ষো
PFX	O	স	 স/X	স[^েো]
PFX	O	সে	সি/X	সে
PFX	O	সো	সু/X	সো
PFX	O	হ	 হ/X	হ[^েো]
PFX	O	হে	হি/X	হে
PFX	O	হো	হু/X	হো

# Rules:  ো>ু  only changes
